Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-386
Knowing and intentional abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult or senior adult; penalty.

(1) A person commits knowing and intentional abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult or senior adult if he or she through a knowing and intentional act causes or permits a vulnerable adult or senior adult to be:

(a) Physically injured;

(b) Unreasonably confined;

(c) Sexually abused;

(d) Exploited;

(e) Cruelly punished;

(f) Neglected; or

(g) Sexually exploited.

(2) Knowing and intentional abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult or senior adult is a Class IIIA felony.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 39;

Laws 1997, LB 364, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB1051, § 15;

Laws 2016, LB934, § 9.

Registration of sex offenders, see sections 29-4001 to 29-4014.

The initial step when determining whether this section has been violated is to determine whether the victim was a vulnerable adult. State v. Stubbs, 252 Neb. 420, 562 N.W.2d 547 (1997).

The term "neglected" as used in subdivision (1)(f) of this section includes an act or omission. State v. Boyd, 28
Neb. App. 874, 949 N.W.2d 540 (2020).

The initial step when determining if this section has been violated is to determine whether the victim was a vulnerable adult. The State has the burden of proving all essential elements of the crime charged. State v. Janssen, 7 Neb. App. 384, 584 N.W.2d 27 (1998).

In order to convict someone of the crime of exploitation of a vulnerable adult, there must be a nexus between a vulnerable adult's impairment and the exploitation. State v. Stubbs, 5 Neb. App. 38, 555 N.W.2d 55 (1996).